District of Columbia statutes.
16-4212

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration should be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Mediation Act.